Hawaii statutes.
[§551E‑33] Construction of authority
generally. Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney, by
executing a power of attorney that incorporates by reference a subject
described in sections 551E-34 through 551E-47 or that grants to an agent authority
to do all acts that a principal could do pursuant to section 551E-31(c), a
principal authorizes the agent, with respect to that subject, to:

(1) Demand, receive, and obtain by litigation or
otherwise, money or another thing of value to which the principal is, may
become, or claims to be entitled, and conserve, invest, disburse, or use
anything so received or obtained for the purposes intended;

(2) Contract in any manner with any person, on terms
agreeable to the agent, to accomplish a purpose of a transaction and perform,
rescind, cancel, terminate, reform, restate, release, or modify the contract or
another contract made by or on behalf of the principal;

(3) Execute, acknowledge, seal, deliver, file, or
record any instrument or communication the agent considers desirable to
accomplish a purpose of a transaction, including creating at any time a
schedule listing some or all of the principal's property and attaching it to
the power of attorney;

(4) Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative
dispute resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with
respect to a claim existing in favor of or against the principal or intervene
in litigation relating to the claim;

(5) Seek on the principal's behalf the assistance of
a court or other governmental agency to carry out an act authorized in the
power of attorney;

(6) Engage, compensate, and discharge an attorney,
accountant, discretionary investment manager, expert witness, or other advisor;

(7) Prepare, execute, and file a record, report, or
other document to safeguard or promote the principal's interest under a statute
or regulation;

(8) Communicate with any representative or employee
of a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, on
behalf of the principal;

(9) Access communications intended for, and
communicate on behalf of the principal, whether by mail, electronic
transmission, telephone, or other means; and

(10) Do any lawful act with respect to the subject and
all property related to the subject. [L 2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next